Florida, session 2026, HB1515.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) is added to section 381.9312,
Florida Statutes, to read:
381.9312 Uterine fibroid research database; education and
public awareness.—
(4) PUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.—All records and personal
identifying information relating to women diagnosed with or
treated for uterine fibroids which is submitted to the
department under this section are confidential and exempt from
s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
This subsection is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review
Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on
October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1515 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1515, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
necessity to make all records and personal identifying
information relating to women diagnosed with or treated for
uterine fibroids which is submitted to the Department of Health
under s. 381.9312, Florida Statutes, confidential and exempt
from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of
the State Constitution. The Department of Health is unable to
effectively implement the legislative purpose of the uterine
fibroid research database, created under s. 381.9312, Florida
Statutes, without access to these records and information, which
include personal medical information, the disclosure of which
would violate federal patient privacy laws, including the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. Therefore,
the Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to make such
records and information held by the department confidential and
exempt to protect the privacy rights of women diagnosed with and
treated for uterine fibroids in this state and promote the
effective administration of the department's epidemiological
research and tracking activities.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1515 -01-er